Utah statutes.
31A-11-101.   Prohibition of unauthorized motor clubs.

(1)  No person may act as a motor club, except:

(a)  a corporation authorized under Chapter 5 or 14 which actually engages in the insurance of automobiles against liability, physical damage, or both; or

(b)  a corporation or division of a corporation authorized under this chapter.

(2)  No person is acting as a motor club merely by offering travel-related services that do not constitute insurance, or by arranging, through producers qualified under Chapter 23a, Insurance Marketing - Licensing Producers, Consultants, and Reinsurance Intermediaries, for insurance coverages underwritten by insurers authorized to do business in this state.



Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

